Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 15
ELECTION OFFENSES

31-10-1501. District attorney or attorney general to prosecute.

Any person may file with the district attorney an affidavit stating the name of any person who has violated any of the provisions of this article and stating the facts which constitute the alleged offense. Upon the filing of such affidavit, the district attorney shall forthwith investigate, and, if reasonable grounds appear therefor, he shall prosecute the same.

The attorney general of the state shall have equal power with district attorneys to file informations or complaints against any person for violating any provision of this article.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1069, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1502. Sufficiency of complaint - judicial notice.

Irregularities or defects in the mode of calling, giving notice of, convening, holding, or conducting any regular or special election constitutes no defense to a prosecution for a violation of this article. When an offense is committed in relation to any municipal election, an indictment, information, or complaint for such offense is sufficient if it alleges that such election was authorized by law, without stating the call or notice of the election, the names of the judges of election holding such election, or the names of the persons voted for at such election. Judicial notice shall be taken of the holding of any regular or special election.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1069, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1507, § 32, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1503. Immunity of witness from prosecution.

Any person violating any provision of this article is a competent witness against any other such violator and may be compelled to attend and testify upon any trial, hearing, proceeding, or investigation in the same manner as any other person, but the testimony so given shall not be used in any prosecution or proceeding, civil or criminal, against the person so testifying except for perjury in giving such testimony. A person so testifying shall not thereafter be liable to indictment, prosecution, or punishment for the offense with reference to which his testimony was given and may plead or prove the giving of testimony accordingly in bar of such indictment or prosecution.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1504. Penalties for election offenses.

In all cases where an offense is denominated by this article as being a misdemeanor and no penalty is specified, the offender, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1304 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1505. Payment of fines.

All fines collected under the provisions of this article shall be paid to the county in which the municipality concerned is located.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1305 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1506. Perjury.

Any person, having taken any oath or made any affirmation required by this article, who swears or affirms willfully, corruptly, and falsely in a matter material to the issue or point in question or suborns any other person to swear or affirm willfully, corruptly, and falsely commits perjury in the second degree or subornation of perjury.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1507. Forgery.

Any person who falsely makes, alters, forges, or counterfeits any ballot before or after it has been cast, or who forges any name of a person as a signer or witness to a petition or nomination paper, or who forges the name of a registered elector to an absent voter's ballot commits forgery.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1027, § 57, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1307 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1508. Tampering with nomination papers.

Any person who, being in possession of nomination papers entitled to be filed under this article 10, wrongfully or willfully destroys, defaces, mutilates, suppresses, neglects, or fails to cause the same to be filed by the proper time in the clerk's office or who files any such paper knowing the same, or any part thereof, to be falsely made commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3251, § 512, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1308 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1509. Bribery of petition signers.

Any person who offers or knowingly permits any person to offer for his or her benefit any bribe or promise of gain to an elector to induce the elector to sign any nomination petition or other election paper, or any person who accepts any such bribe or promise of gain of any kind in the nature of a bribe as consideration for signing the same, whether such bribe or promise of gain in the nature of a bribe is offered or accepted before or after signing, commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3251, § 513, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1309 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1510. Statements of expenses. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1070, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

Entire section repealed, p. 273, § 7, effective April 30.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-10-1310 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1511. Custody and delivery of ballots and other election papers.

Any election official having charge of official ballots, tally sheets, the registration book or list, and the pollbook who destroys, conceals, or suppresses the same, except as expressly permitted by this article 10, commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Any election official who has undertaken to deliver the official ballots, the tally sheets, the registration book or list, and the pollbook to the clerk and who neglects or refuses to do so within the time prescribed by law or who fails to account fully for all official ballots and other papers in the election official's charge commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1071, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3251, § 514, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1311 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1512. Destroying, removing, or delaying delivery of ballots and other election papers.

Any person who willfully destroys or defaces any ballot or tally sheet, or who willfully delays the delivery of the ballots, tally sheets, registration book or list, or pollbook, or who conceals or removes any ballot, ballot box, or tally sheet from the polling place or from the possession of the person authorized by law to have the custody thereof, or who aids, counsels, procures, or assists any person in doing any of said acts commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1071, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3251, § 515, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1312 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1513. Unlawfully refusing or permitting to vote.

Any election judge who willfully and maliciously refuses or neglects to receive the ballot of any registered elector who has taken or offered to take the oath prescribed in section 31-10-1105 or knowingly and willfully permits any person to vote who is not entitled to vote at any election commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1071, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3252, § 516, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1313 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1514. Revealing how elector voted.

Any election official, watcher, or person who assists an individual with a disability in voting and who reveals how the individual with a disability voted commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1071, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section amended, (SB 14-118), ch. 250, p. 986, § 21, effective August 6.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3252, § 517, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1314 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1515. Violation of duty.

Any municipal official election official or other person upon whom any duty is imposed by this article 10 who violates, neglects, or omits to perform such duty or is guilty of corrupt conduct in the discharge of the same, or any notary public or other officer authorized by law to administer oaths who administers an oath knowing it to be false or who knowingly makes a false certificate in regard to an election matter, commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1071, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3252, § 518, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1315 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1516. Unlawful receipt of money.

It is unlawful for any person, directly or indirectly, by himself or through any other person:

To receive, agree to, or contract for, before or during any municipal election, any money, gift, loan, or other valuable consideration for himself or any other person for voting or agreeing to vote, or for going or agreeing to go to the polls, or for remaining away or agreeing to remain away from the polls, or for refraining or agreeing to refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at any municipal election; or

To receive any money or other valuable thing during or after any municipal election on account of himself or any other person for voting or refraining from voting at such election, or on account of himself or any other person for voting or refraining from voting for any particular person at such election, or on account of himself or any other person for going to the polls or remaining away from the polls at such election, or on account of having induced any person to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or measure at such election.

Each offense mentioned in subsection (1) of this section is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1072, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3252, § 519, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1316 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1517. Disclosing or identifying vote.

No person shall solicit or induce a voter to reveal how he or she voted. No voter shall place any mark upon his or her ballot by means of which it can be identified as the one voted by him or her, and no other mark shall be placed upon the ballot to identify it after it has been prepared for voting.

Any voter may show his or her voted ballot to any other person as long as the disclosure is not undertaken in furtherance of any election violation proscribed in this part 15.

Any voter who makes available an image of the voter's own ballot through electronic means after it is prepared for voting is deemed to have consented to the transmittal of that image.

The ability of a voter to disclose his or her voted ballot as described in this subsection (2) at a polling place or at any other location at which votes are being tabulated is subject to the power of the clerk to properly monitor activity at such polling place or other location, including placing reasonable restrictions on the use of photography in such settings or imposing other restrictions on activity in such settings as the clerk finds necessary, to ensure the fair and efficient conduct of elections.

Any person violating subsection (1) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1072, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (HB 17-1014), ch. 42, p. 124, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3252, § 520, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1317 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1518. Delivering and receiving ballots at polls.

No voter shall receive an official ballot from any person except one of the judges of election, and no person other than a judge of election shall deliver an official ballot to a voter.

No person except a judge of election shall receive from any voter a ballot prepared for voting.

Any voter who does not vote the ballot received by him shall return his ballot to the judge of election from whom he received the same before leaving the polling place.

Each violation of the provisions of this section is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1072, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 1507, § 33, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 521, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1318 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1519. Voting twice.

Any person who votes more than once or, having voted once, offers to vote again or offers to deposit in the ballot box more than one ballot commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1072, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 105, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 522, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1319 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1520. Voting in the wrong precinct.

Any person who, at any municipal election, fraudulently votes or offers to vote in any precinct in which he or she does not reside commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1072, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 106, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 523, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1320 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1521. Electioneering near polls.

Any person who does any electioneering on election day within any polling place or in any public street or room or in any public manner within one hundred feet of any building in which a polling place is located commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1073, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 524, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1321 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1521.5. Anonymous statements concerning candidates or issues - penalties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1713, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 1545, § 16, effective July 1.

31-10-1522. Employer's unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for any employer, whether corporation, association, company, firm, or person, or any officer or agent of such employer:

To refuse any of his employees the privilege of taking time off to vote as provided in section 31-10-603; or

To influence the vote of any employee by force, violence, or restraint, or by inflicting or threatening to inflict any injury, damage, harm, or loss, or by discharging from employment, or by promoting in employment; or

To enclose, in paying his employees the salary or wages due them, their pay in pay envelopes upon which there are written or printed any political mottoes, devices, or arguments containing threats, expressed or implied, intended or calculated to control the political opinions, views, or actions of such employees; or

To put up or otherwise exhibit, within ninety days prior to any municipal election, in his factory, workshop, mine, mill, office, or other establishment or place where his employees may be working or be present in the course of such employment any handbill, notice, or placard containing any threat, notice, or information that, in case any particular candidate is elected or issue is carried, work in his place or establishment will cease in whole or in part or the wages of his employees be reduced or containing any other threats, expressed or implied, intended or calculated to control the political opinions or actions of his employees; or

To either expressly or by implication threaten, intimidate, influence, induce, or compel any employee to vote or refrain from voting for any particular person or issue in any municipal election or to refrain from voting at any municipal election.

Each offense mentioned in subsection (1) of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1073, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 525, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1322 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1523. Intimidation.

It is unlawful for any person directly or indirectly, by himself or herself, or any other person in his or her behalf, to make use of any force, violence, restraint, abduction, duress, or forcible or fraudulent device or contrivance, or to inflict or threaten the infliction of any injury, damage, harm, or loss, or in any manner to practice intimidation upon or against any person in order to impede, prevent, or otherwise interfere with the free exercise of the elective franchise of any qualified elector, or to compel, induce, or prevail upon any qualified elector either to give or refrain from giving the elector's vote at any municipal election or to give or refrain from giving the elector's vote for any particular person or measure at any such election. Each such offense is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1073, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3253, § 526, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1323 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1524. Unlawfully giving or promising money.

It is unlawful for any person, directly, by himself, or through any other person:

To pay, loan, or contribute or offer or promise to pay, loan, or contribute any money or other valuable consideration to or for any qualified or registered elector or to or for any other person to induce such elector to vote or refrain from voting at any municipal election, or to induce any registered elector to vote or refrain from voting at such election for any particular person, or to induce such elector to go to the polls or remain away from the polls at such election or on account of such qualified or registered elector having voted or refrained from voting for any particular person or having gone to the polls or remained away from the polls at such election; or

To advance or pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing to or for the use of any other person with the intent that the same, or any part thereof, be used in bribery at any municipal election or to knowingly pay or cause to be paid any money or other valuable thing to any person in discharge or repayment of any money wholly or in part expended in bribery at any such election.

Each offense mentioned in subsection (1) of this section is a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1073, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 527, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1324 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1525. Corrupt means of influencing vote.

If any person, by bribery, menace, or other corrupt means or device whatsoever, either directly or indirectly, attempts to influence any voter of this state in giving the voter's vote or ballot, or deters the voter from giving the same, or disturbs or hinders the voter in the free exercise of the right of suffrage at any municipal election in this state, or fraudulently or deceitfully changes or alters a ballot, such person so offending commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 528, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1325 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1526. Interference with voter while voting.

Any person who interferes with any voter when inside the immediate voting area or when marking a ballot or operating a voting machine commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 529, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1326 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1527. Introducing liquor into polls - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section repealed, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 530, effective March 1, 2022.

31-10-1528. Inducing defective ballot.

Any person who willfully causes a ballot to misstate in any way the wishes of the voter casting the same or who causes any other deceit to be practiced with intent fraudulently to induce such voter to deposit a defective ballot so as to have the ballot thrown out and not counted commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 531, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1328 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1529. Personating elector.

Any person who falsely personates any registered elector and votes under the name of such elector commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 858, § 107, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3254, § 532, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1329 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1530. Altering posted abstract of votes.

Any person who defaces, mutilates, alters, or unlawfully removes the abstract of votes posted outside of a polling place commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1074, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3255, § 533, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1330 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1531. Wagers with electors.

It is unlawful for any person, including any candidate for public office, before or during any municipal election, to make any bet or wager with a qualified elector or take a share or interest in, or in any manner become a party to, any such bet or wager or provide or agree to provide any money to be used by another in making such bet or wager upon any event or contingency whatever arising out of such election. For each such offense, the offender commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3255, § 534, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1331 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1532. Tampering with notices or supplies.

Any person who, prior to a municipal election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any notice of election posted in accordance with the provisions of this article 10, or who, during an election, willfully defaces, removes, or destroys any card of instruction or sample ballot posted for the instruction of voters, or who, during an election, willfully removes or destroys any of the supplies or conveniences furnished to enable a voter to prepare the voter's ballot commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3255, § 535, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1332 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1533. Tampering with registration book, registration list, or pollbook.

Any person who mutilates or erases any name, figure, or word on any registration book, registration list, or pollbook, or who removes such registration book, registration list, or pollbook or any part thereof from the place where it has been deposited with an intention to destroy the same, or to procure or prevent the election of any person, or to prevent any registered elector from voting, or who destroys any registration book or pollbook or part thereof commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3255, § 536, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1333 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1534. Tampering with voting machine.

Any person who tampers with a voting machine before, during, or after any municipal election with intent to change the tabulation of votes thereon to reflect other than an accurate accounting commits a class 1 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3255, § 537, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1334 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1535. Interference with election official.

Any person who at any municipal election intentionally interferes with any election official in the discharge of the election official's duty, or who induces any election official to violate or refuse to comply with the election official's duty, or who aids, counsels, procures, advises, or assists any person to do so commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3256, § 538, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1335 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1536. Unlawful qualification as taxpaying elector.

It is unlawful to take or place title to property in the name of another, or to pay the taxes, or to take or issue a tax receipt in the name of another for the purpose of attempting to qualify such person as a "qualified taxpaying elector", or to aid or assist any person to do so. The ballot of any such person violating this section shall be void. Each person violating any of the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3256, § 539, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1336 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1537. Absentee voting.

Any election official or other person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this article 10 relative to the casting of absent voters' ballots or who aids or abets fraud in connection with any absent vote cast or to be cast commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1075, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 859, § 108, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3256, § 540, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1337 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1538. Article to be liberally construed.

This article shall be liberally construed so that all legally registered electors may be permitted to vote and so that fraud and corruption in municipal elections may be prevented.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1338 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1539. Applicability.

This article shall apply to regular and special municipal elections.

This article shall not apply to cities, towns, or cities and counties having home rule, but any such city, town, or city and county may adopt all or any part of this article by reference.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-10-1339 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-10-1540. Political campaign signs - restrictions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1076, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

Entire section repealed, p. 293, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

Before its repeal, this section was similar to former § 31-10-1340 as it existed prior to 1975.